Arkansas, session 2025, HB1172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-1702(2)(B), concerning the definition
of "adverse action" within the Medicaid Fairness Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(B) To constitute an adverse decision, an agency decision
need not have a monetary penalty attached but must have or a direct monetary
consequence to the provider, including an enforcement action.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-77-1702, concerning the definitions
within the Medicaid Fairness Act, is amended to add an additional subdivision
to read as follows:
(20) "Enforcement action" means an action or decision by the
department or its reviewers or contractors that affects a Medicaid provider
in regard to the enforcement of a rule of the department.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 17, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
*JMB124*
01/16/2025 1:35:03 PM JMB124

HB1172
20-77-1719. Adverse actions resulting from enforcement actions.
In addition to the requirements of this subchapter regarding an adverse
action, the Department of Human Services shall ensure that an adverse action
resulting from an enforcement action meets the following minimum
requirements:
(1)(A) A provider shall be given no less than forty-eight (48)
hours' notice of a scheduled, routine monitor visit to conduct an
organization-wide one (1) time per licensing or certification period in a
single audit event.
(B) An inspection visit to conduct an investigation of a
complaint of non-compliance received from a third party shall not require
notice as described under subdivision (1)(A) of this section;
(2)(A) A provider may challenge a violation in any enforcement
action by filing a reconsideration request setting forth the reasons the
alleged violation resulting in an enforcement act is invalid.
(B) The reconsideration request shall be ruled upon by the
enforcement entity within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the
reconsideration request under subdivision (2)(A) of this section.
(C) If the reconsideration request under subdivision
(2)(A) of this section is not ruled upon within the time frame under
subdivision (2)(B) of this section, the violation shall be vacated by
operation of law; and
(3) If a provider's reconsideration request under subdivision
(2) of this section is not approved, the provider may administratively appeal
the violation.











01/16/2025 1:35:03 PM JMB124